Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1104
Credit allowance date, defined.

Credit allowance date means,
with respect to any qualified equity investment:

(1) The date on which such
investment is initially made; and

(2) Each of the six anniversary dates of such date
thereafter.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 4.